North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-58 Urban Renewal Law
40-58-20.3.
Tax increment financing reports.

For each development or renewal plan for any development or renewal area under section 40-58-20 in existence at the end of a calendar year, the governing body of the municipality shall file an annual report with the department of commerce, by the following July thirty-first, which is in a format prescribed by the department. The report must include:

The total of outstanding indebtedness.

The balance of funds on hand.

The name of the tax increment financing district.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 300, § 5.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.